Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1736.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of administration; Navajo water pipeline project; exemption A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in each of fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo Nation for the Navajo Nation department of water resources to survey, design, plan and construct the Navajo water pipeline project in the Fort Defiance region. B. The appropriations made in subsection A of this section are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.